Maryland, session 2025, HB1168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
25–501.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “CLASS” INCLUDES A CLASS BASED ON THE SIZE OF
THE METER ON THE WATER CONNECTION LEADING TO A PROPERTY.
(B) The Commission shall set [a service rate] ONE OR MORE SERVICE RATES
that the Commission considers necessary to provide funds for:
(1) maintaining, repairing, and operating its water supply and sewer
systems, including the overhead expense and depreciation allowance; and
(2) making any payments to the District of Columbia, as specified in this
title.
[(b)] (C) [The] EACH service rate:
(1) shall be chargeable against all properties IN A CLASS for a connection
with any line owned by the Commission;
(2) shall be uniform FOR THE CLASS throughout the sanitary district; and
(3) may be changed as necessary.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH ONE OR MORE CUSTOMER CLASSES
FOR ANY SERVICE RATE OR CHARGE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE.
25–502.

HOUSE BILL 1168
(a) (1) Except as provided in this subtitle, [the] EACH service rate for water
shall consist of:
(i) a minimum or a ready to serve charge, WHICH MAY INCLUDE
AN INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT COMPONENT; and
(ii) a charge for water used.
(2) (I) The minimum or ready to serve charge [shall] MAY be based on
the size of the meter on the water connection leading to [the] A property OR ON OTHER
CRITERIA DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS THE COMMISSION
ADOPTS.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY CREATE CUSTOMER CLASSES
WITHIN ANY METER SIZE FOR THE MINIMUM OR READY TO SERVE CHARGE.
(3) The charge for water used shall be based on the amount of water
passing the meter during the period between the last two readings.
(4) The meter shall be placed on each water connection by and at the
expense of the Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.